Rhode Island statutes. Title 19 Financial Institutions
Chapter 14.11 Third-Party Loan Servicers

19-14.11-1.
License required.

No person shall act as a third-party loan servicer, directly or indirectly, for a loan to a Rhode Island borrower without first obtaining a license under this chapter from the director, or the director’s designee.

No license shall be required of:

A depository institution, or an affiliate or subsidiary of a depository institution, that is controlled by, or under common control with, the depository institution and subject to the regulatory authority of the primary regulator of the depository institution.

A lender licensed under chapter 14 of title 19 that retains the servicing rights on a loan originally closed in the lender’s name and subsequently sold, in whole or in part, to a third party, provided that the provisions of §§ 19-14.11-2 (segregated accounts) and 19-14.11-4 (prohibited acts and practices) of this chapter shall apply to such lender.

A debt-management company licensed in this state when engaged in activities permitted pursuant to its debt-management license.

An attorney licensed in this state when collecting a debt on behalf of a client.

Bona-fide nonprofit, organizations, exempt from taxation under section 501(c) of the Internal Revenue Code, that are approved by the Department of Housing and Urban Development as housing counseling agencies; that have a physical location in Rhode Island; and that lend state or federal funds.

History of Section.

P.L. 2014, ch. 487, § 2; P.L. 2014, ch. 522, § 2.

19-14.11-2.
Segregated accounts.

All amounts paid by borrowers to a licensee subject to this chapter shall be deposited in one or more accounts maintained at a federally insured depository institution, and with respect to such funds, the licensee shall act as a fiduciary. Such account, or accounts, shall be segregated from all other accounts of the licensee. Such funds shall not be used in the conduct of the licensee’s personal affairs or in the licensee’s business affairs.

The licensee may withdraw funds from the segregated account for payment directly to the owner of the loan or other third party of principal and interest and other payments as may be required pursuant to the terms of the loan document or servicing contract.

The licensee may withdraw funds from the segregated account for commissions to which it is entitled for services actually performed.

The licensee may return funds from the segregated account to the borrower if not prohibited.

The licensee shall maintain complete and accurate account records, including, at a minimum, the source of all deposits; the nature and recipient of all disbursements; the date and amount of each transaction; and the name of the borrower. All documents pertaining to account activity shall be produced upon request of the director.

History of Section.

P.L. 2014, ch. 487, § 2; P.L. 2014, ch. 522, § 2.

19-14.11-3.
Records required of licensee.

The licensee shall keep, use in the licensee’s business, and make available to the director, or the director’s designee, upon request, such books, accounts, records, and data compilations as will enable the director, or director’s designee, to determine whether such licensee is complying with the provisions of this and other applicable chapters and with the rules and regulations promulgated thereunder. Every licensee shall preserve such books, accounts, records, and data compilations in a secure manner and in accordance with §

19-14-20

for at least three (3) years after making the final entry on any loan recorded therein.

History of Section.

P.L. 2014, ch. 487, § 2; P.L. 2014, ch. 522, § 2.

19-14.11-4.
Prohibited acts and practices.

It is a violation of this chapter for a person to:

Directly or indirectly employ any scheme, device, or artifice to defraud or mislead borrowers or lenders or to defraud any person.

Engage in any unfair or deceptive practice toward any person.

Obtain property by fraud or misrepresentation.

Use any unfair or unconscionable means in servicing a loan.

Knowingly misapply or recklessly apply loan payments to the outstanding balance of a loan.

Knowingly misapply or recklessly apply payments to escrow accounts.

Require the unnecessary forced placement of insurance when adequate insurance is currently in place.

Fail to provide loan payoff information within the time period set forth in chapter 19.

Charge excessive or unreasonable fees to provide loan payoff information.

Fail to manage and maintain escrow accounts in accordance with §

19-9-2

.

Knowingly or recklessly provide inaccurate information to a credit bureau, thereby harming a consumer’s credit worthiness.

Fail to report both the favorable and unfavorable payment history of the consumer to a nationally recognized consumer credit bureau at least annually if the servicer regularly reports information to a credit bureau.

Collect private mortgage insurance beyond the date for which private mortgage insurance is required.

Knowingly or recklessly facilitate the illegal foreclosure of real property collateral.

Knowingly or recklessly facilitate the illegal repossession of chattel collateral.

Fail to respond to consumer complaints in a timely manner.

Conduct any business covered by this chapter without holding a valid license as required under this chapter, or assist, or aid and abet, any person in the conduct of business under this chapter without a valid license as required under this chapter.

Fail to comply with any federal or state law, rule, or other legally binding authority relating to the evaluation of loans for modification purposes or the modification of loans.

Fail to comply with this chapter, or rules adopted under this chapter, or fail to comply with any orders or directives from the director, or fail to comply with any other state or federal law, including the regulations thereunder, applicable to any business authorized or conducted under this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 2014, ch. 487, § 2; P.L. 2014, ch. 522, § 2.